Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1811.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-120.05, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-120.05. Student access to internet; student use of wireless communication devices; policies and procedures; annual notice; definitions A. Each school district governing board and charter school governing body shall prescribe and enforce policies and procedures that both: 1. Govern student access to the internet as provided by the school, including policies that restrict student access to social media platforms.  The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall must allow teachers to give students access to social media platforms to the extent necessary for educational purposes. 2. Limit the use of wireless communication devices by students during the school day. The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall must do all of the following: (a) Allow students to use wireless communication devices if any of the following applies: (i) For educational purposes, as directed by the student's teacher. (ii) During In the case of an emergency. (iii) The student needs the student's wireless communication device because the student has a medical condition. (b) Include procedures for a student's parent to contact the student during the school day. (c) Include procedures for a student to contact the student's parent during the school day. B. At the beginning of each school year, the school district shall provide to parents, teachers and students a copy of the policies adopted pursuant to subsection A of this section and notify the parents, teachers and students of any changes to the policy. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "School day" means periods of time when students are at school, including meals, passing periods and recess. 2. "Social media platform" means a website, computer application or other digital platform that is used for social networking and creating or exchanging virtual content. 3. "Wireless communication devices" includes personal devices and devices that are provided by the school. END_STATUTE